Washington statutes.
RCW 35.92.350

Electrical construction or improvement—Bid proposals—Contract proposal forms—Conditions for issuance—Refusal—Appeal.

Any city or town owning an electrical utility shall require that bid proposals upon any electrical construction or improvement shall be made upon contract proposal form supplied by the governing authority of such utility, and in no other manner. The governing authority shall, before furnishing any person, firm or corporation desiring to bid upon any electrical work with a contract proposal form, require from such person, firm or corporation, answers to questions contained in a standard form of questionnaire and financial statement, including a complete statement of the financial ability and experience of such person, firm, or corporation in performing electrical work. Such questionnaire shall be sworn to before a notary public or other person authorized to take acknowledgment of deeds, and shall be submitted once a year and at such other times as the governing authority may require. Whenever the governing authority is not satisfied with the sufficiency of the answers contained in such questionnaire and financial statement or whenever the governing authority determines that such person, firm, or corporation does not meet all of the requirements hereinafter set forth it may refuse to furnish such person, firm or corporation with a contract proposal form and any bid proposal of such person, firm or corporation must be disregarded. In order to obtain a contract proposal form, a person, firm or corporation shall have all of the following requirements:

(1) Adequate financial resources, or the ability to secure such resources;

(2) The necessary experience, organization, and technical qualifications to perform the proposed contract;

(3) The ability to comply with the required performance schedule taking into consideration all of its existing business commitments;

(4) A satisfactory record of performance, integrity, judgment, and skills; and

(5) Be otherwise qualified and eligible to receive an award under applicable laws and regulations.

Such refusal shall be conclusive unless appeal therefrom to the superior court of the county where the utility district is situated or Thurston county be taken within fifteen days, which appeal shall be heard summarily within ten days after the same is taken and on five days' notice thereof to the governing authority of the utility.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 220 s 1.]